Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Administrative costs" means all operating, administrative, and maintenance expenses for a program or a designated entity.

(2) "Attendance" means the total number of visits by persons in physical attendance during a year at cultural organization facilities located or cultural organization programs provided within the county creating a program, including attendance for which admission was paid, discounted, or free, consistent with and verifiable under guidelines adopted by the appropriate program.

(3) "Cultural organization" means a nonprofit corporation incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington and recognized by the internal revenue service as described in section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, with its principal location or locations and conducting a majority of its activities within the state, not including: Any agency of the state or any of its political subdivisions; any municipal corporation; any organization that raises funds for redistribution to multiple cultural organizations; or any radio or television broadcasting network or station, cable communications system, internet-based communications venture or service, newspaper, or magazine. The primary purpose of the organization must be the advancement and preservation of science or technology, the visual or performing arts, zoology, botany, anthropology, heritage, or natural history and any organization must directly provide programming or experiences available to the general public. Any organization with the primary purpose of advancing and preserving zoology such as zoos and aquariums must be or support a facility that is accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums or its functional successor. A state-related cultural organization may be a cultural organization.

(4) "Designated entity" means the entity designated by the legislative authority of a county creating the program, as required under RCW 36.160.110(4). The entity may be a public agency, including the state arts commission established under chapter 43.46 RCW, or a Washington nonprofit corporation that is not a cultural organization eligible for funding under this chapter.

(5) "Program" means a cultural access program established by a county by ordinance.

(6) "Revenues" means revenues from all sources generated by a cultural organization, consistent with generally accepted accounting practices and any program guidelines, excluding: (a) Revenues associated with capital projects other than major maintenance projects including, but not limited to, capital campaign expenses; (b) funds provided under this chapter; (c) revenue that would be considered unrelated business taxable income under the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended; and (d) with respect to a state-related cultural organization, state funding received by it or for the institution it supports. Revenues include transfers from an organization's endowment or reserves and may include the value of in-kind goods and services to the extent permitted under any program guidelines.

(7) "State-related cultural organization" means an organization incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of the state of Washington and recognized by the internal revenue service as described in section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, with a primary purpose and directly providing programming or experiences available to the general public consistent with the requirements for recognition as a cultural organization under this chapter operating in a facility owned and supported by the state, a state agency, or state educational institution.

[ 2020 c 192 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 201.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.